Maryland, session 2026, HB1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 27. PALLIATIVE CARE.
19–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FACILITY” MEANS A HOSPITAL, NURSING HOME, HOSPICE CARE
FACILITY, OR OTHER LONG–TERM CARE FACILITY LICENSED IN THE STATE.
(C) “PALLIATIVE CARE” MEANS SPECIALIZED MEDICAL CARE FOR
INDIVIDUALS LIVING WITH SERIOUS ILLNESS THAT IS FOCUSED ON PROVIDING
RELIEF FROM SYMPTOMS, PAIN, AND STRESS, REGARDLESS OF DIAGNOSIS OR STAGE

HOUSE BILL 1251 3
OF DISEASE, WITH THE GOAL OF IMPROVING QUALITY OF LIFE FOR BOTH THE
PATIENT AND THE PATIENT’S FAMILY.
19–2702.
(A) ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2027, EACH FACILITY SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE PATIENTS WITH ACCESS TO A DEDICATED PALLIATIVE
CARE PROGRAM;
(2) ENSURE THAT PALLIATIVE CARE IS AVAILABLE AS A TREATMENT
OPTION ALONGSIDE CURATIVE OR LIFE–PROLONGING TREATMENTS; AND
(3) AS APPROPRIATE, INFORM PATIENTS AND THEIR FAMILIES OF
THE AVAILABILITY OF PALLIATIVE CARE SERVICES AT THE TIME OF DIAGNOSIS OF A
SERIOUS ILLNESS, DURING TREATMENT PLANNING, AND AT THE TIME OF HOSPITAL
ADMISSION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING
MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR THE DELIVERY OF PALLIATIVE CARE, INCLUDING
STAFFING, TRAINING, AND QUALITY ASSURANCE REQUIREMENTS.
19–2703.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON ACCESS, UTILIZATION, AND
QUALITY OF PALLIATIVE CARE SERVICES PROVIDED IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PALLIATIVE CARE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
19–2701 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS

HOUSE BILL 1251
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PALLIATIVE CARE, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING SERVICES AS THEY
RELATE TO PALLIATIVE CARE:
(I) PHYSICIAN AND NURSING SERVICES;
(II) COUNSELING AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES;
(III) PAIN MANAGEMENT AND SYMPTOM RELIEF;
(IV) HOME–BASED AND COMMUNITY–BASED CARE; AND
(V) SOCIAL WORK, CARE COORDINATION, AND FAMILY
SUPPORT SERVICES.
(2) THE COVERAGE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE:
(I) DENIED BECAUSE A PATIENT IS CONTINUING CURATIVE
TREATMENT; OR
(II) LIMITED TO END–OF–LIFE CARE.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT,
COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON COVERAGE FOR PALLIATIVE
CARE THAT IS GREATER THAN THE COPAY, COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE
REQUIREMENT FOR OTHER COMPARABLE MEDICAL SERVICES.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY SUBJECT PALLIATIVE CARE TO THE DEDUCTIBLE
REQUIREMENT OF THE HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act may not
be construed to prevent a facility from providing access to palliative care before October 1,
2027.

HOUSE BILL 1251 5
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.